California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(4) (A) If the harbor agency is acting on granted lands, all of the projects and uses proposed in the seaport infrastructure financing district are consistent with the state tidelands trust and the conditions of the harbor agency grant.

(B) If the harbor agency was formed pursuant to this code, all of the projects and uses proposed in the seaport infrastructure financing district are consistent with its charter and the statewide interests in the operation of harbors and ports.

(c) (1) The harbor agency shall not grant preliminary approval under this section unless both of the following apply:

(A) The seaport infrastructure financing district will operate independently of any other prior or concurrent agreements between the harbor agency and the public financing authority, or the local governments that make up the public financing authority.

(B) No transfers of funds or obligations, or future transfers of funds or obligations contingent on the approval of the seaport infrastructure financing district, its financing,
 or projects within the district, are created between the harbor agency and the public financing authority, or the local governments that make up the public financing authority.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “transfers of funds or obligations” includes any direct or indirect transfer of harbor agency resources to the public financing authority, or the local governments that make up the public financing authority, except for any of the following if agreed to between the harbor agency and the public financing authority in writing:

(A) Harbor agency reimbursements of a public financing authority for its direct administrative costs of establishing the seaport infrastructure financing district.

(B) Public financing authority expenses for underwriting the bond issuance for the identified projects in the seaport
 infrastructure financing district.

(C) Any other administrative expenses or direct operating expenses that are incurred as the direct result of creating the seaport infrastructure financing district that are identified by both parties at the time of preliminary approval and in advance of the expense being incurred by the public financing authority.

(d) If a harbor agency votes to give preliminary approval to the proposal, it shall immediately forward its preliminary approval to the State Lands Commission for its consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.

(a) Upon receipt of a preliminary approval from a harbor agency granted pursuant to Section 1713, the State Lands Commission shall consider the proposal and either grant or deny final approval.

(b) Prior to granting final approval the State Lands Commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Review the infrastructure financing plan prepared by the harbor agency pursuant to Section 1712.

(2) Review the findings of the harbor agency made in its preliminary approval.

(c) The State Lands Commission shall grant
 final approval only if it makes all of the following findings:

(1) The state’s interests in its tidelands and its ports and harbors are furthered by the funding of the seaport infrastructure financing district.

(2) The principal purposes of the seaport infrastructure financing district are to further port and harbor infrastructure.

(3) The execution of the financing section of the infrastructure finance plan is more likely than not to result in the outcomes proposed.

(4) No revenues shall be made available to local governments as a result of the approval of the seaport infrastructure financing district from state revenues, revenues derived from granted lands, or from ports or harbors created under this code, except as otherwise allowed under paragraph
 (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1713.

(5) The harbor agency and the public financing authority participating in the seaport infrastructure financing district have each completed all procedural requirements, financial due diligence, and made all findings required by this chapter and Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(6) All of the projects and uses proposed in the seaport infrastructure financing district are consistent with the state tidelands trust and the conditions of any grants, if applicable, and the statewide interests in the operation of harbors and ports.

(7) No agreements by the harbor agency that may control the discretion of the harbor agency to maintain its port or harbor operations or to cede any such control to the discretion of
 a third party were made as a condition of participation in the seaport infrastructure financing district.

(d) If the State Lands Commission gives final approval to the proposal, it shall immediately forward its approval to the public financing authority for further action pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53398.80.5 of the Government Code.

(e) The State Lands Commission shall be reimbursed by the harbor agency for its direct administrative costs of considering a seaport infrastructure financing district proposal under this section from the proceeds of the bonds issued, if any, for the identified projects in the seaport infrastructure financing district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1715.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code shall apply to this chapter.

(b) To the extent that any provision of this chapter conflicts with any provision of Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code with respect to a seaport infrastructure financing district, this chapter shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1716.

All permanent fixtures and capital improvements to the real property of a harbor agency that administers public trust tidelands made pursuant to a seaport infrastructure district’s approved infrastructure financing plan shall be a trust asset once completed. This provision does not apply to fixtures and improvements otherwise agreed as nonpermanent in a lease between the harbor agency and a private tenant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.

If a harbor agency administering granted public trust property is a department of a local governmental body, any negotiations between the two entities with respect to any infrastructure financing, operations, or any other activity requiring action by the harbor agency shall be undertaken at arm’s length in recognition of the duties of the harbor agency to effectuate statewide interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.

(a) Pursuant to Section 6009 of the Public Resources Code, the State Lands Commission shall retain absolute discretion over the determination of whether or not investment of local resources in port or harbor infrastructure, the actions of a harbor agency, or any other action taken by a seaport infrastructure financing district is consistent with the state’s interests in its tidelands and submerged lands. Nothing in this chapter, including a finding made pursuant to Section 1714, or Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, shall preclude the State Lands Commission from enforcing the state’s interests in its tidelands.

(b) Pursuant to
 Section 6009.1 of the Public Resources Code, a harbor agency that manages granted state tidelands retains its status as a trustee whether or not it is located within a seaport infrastructure financing district. Nothing in this chapter, including a finding made pursuant to Section 1714, or Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, shall preclude the harbor agency from conducting its duties as a trustee of state tidelands.

(c) Nothing in this chapter or in Chapter 2.99 (commencing with Section 53398.50) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code grants any authority to any public financing authority, or the local governments that compose the public finance authority, in any manner whatsoever to manage, direct, control, or exercise jurisdiction over a harbor agency and its management of port or harbor infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1719.

This chapter shall not apply to the Stockton Port District, as established pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 6200) of Division 8, or to a river port district established pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 6800) of Division 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 793, Sec. 11.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. HARBORS AND PORTS MITIGATION PROJECTS [1720. - 1770.]



  CHAPTER 1. Port Facility Construction [1720. - 1730.]

1720.

Any public agency with authority to approve or deny port projects that result in the filling of subtidal habitats within the ocean ports of California or habitats in the water of inland ports of California shall approve, as mitigation for those fill projects, any subtidal or in-water mitigation project proposed by the port authority that the public agency determines provides appropriate and adequate mitigation for the adverse impacts on the affected subtidal or in-water habitat in a manner consistent with other law that is then existing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1730.

(a) For purposes of this section, “council” means the California Marine and Intermodal Transportation System Advisory Council, a regional subunit of the Marine Transportation System National Advisory Council chartered by the federal Secretary of Transportation under the Federal Advisory Committee Act (Public Law 92-463).

(b) The council is requested to do all of the following:

(1) Meet, hold public hearings, and compile data on issues that include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The projected growth of each maritime port in the
 state.

(B) The costs and benefits of developing a coordinated state program to obtain federal funding for maritime port growth, security, and congestion relief.

(C) Impacts of maritime port growth on the state’s transportation system.

(D) Air pollution caused by movement of goods through the state’s maritime ports, and proposed methods of mitigating or alleviating that pollution.

(E) Maritime port security, including, but not limited to, training, readiness, certification of port personnel, exercise planning and conduct, and critical marine transportation system infrastructure protection.

(F) A statewide plan for continuing operation of maritime ports in cooperation with the United States
 Coast Guard, the federal Department of Homeland Security, the California Emergency Management Agency, and the California National Guard, consistent with the state’s emergency management system and the national emergency management system, in the event of a major incident or disruption of port operations in one or more of the state’s maritime ports.

(G) State marine transportation policy, legislation, and planning; regional infrastructure project funding; competitiveness; environmental impacts; port safety and security; and any other matters affecting the marine transportation system of the United States within, or affecting, the state.

(2) Identify all state agencies that are involved with the development, planning, or coordination of maritime ports in the state.

(3) Identify other states that have a statewide port
 master plan and determine whether that plan has assisted those states in improving their maritime ports.

(4) Compile all information obtained pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and submit its findings in a report to the Legislature not later than January 1, 2006. The report should include, but need not be limited to, recommendations on methods to better manage the growth of maritime ports and address the environmental impacts of moving goods through those ports.

(c) The activities of the council pursuant to this section shall not be funded with appropriations from the General Fund.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1760 by Stats. 2011, Ch. 427, Sec. 3.   (SB 739)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Port Congestion Relief and Port Mitigation Relief [1740. - 1770.]

1740.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Ports of Long Beach, Los Angeles, and Oakland operate in unique communities, environments, and markets that require infrastructure improvements and air pollution reduction measures tailored to the nature and degree of need in each port of each community.

(b) There is a need to mitigate the enormous burden imposed on the highway transportation system serving the Ports of Long Beach, Los Angeles, and Oakland by the overland movement of container cargo shipped to and from those ports.

(c) The operations at the ports, including
 the movement of locomotives, ships, and trucks that move cargo containers to and from the ports, cause air pollution that requires mitigation. This pollution contributes to the thousands of premature deaths and billions of dollars of health costs each year attributable to goods movement pollution in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (SB 739)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1750.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2012, the Port of Long Beach shall assess its infrastructure and air quality improvement needs.

(b) The port, when assessing infrastructure projects, shall consult with the Southern California Association of Governments on projects that improve the efficiency of cargo movement and reduce congestion impacts associated with the movement of cargo to and from the port through the southern California region. The port shall identify any project lists and provide any updated information for the projects on those lists. In the assessment, the port, at a minimum, shall identify the projects, funding source or possible funding source, and estimated timelines for completion.

(c) The port, when assessing air quality projects, shall consult with the South Coast Air Quality Management District on projects that reduce pollution associated with the movement of cargo to and from the port through the southern California region, including, but not limited to, projects that reduce pollution from trucks, cargo handling equipment, locomotives, and ships that move cargo within and to and from the port. The port shall identify any project lists, such as the Goods Movement Emission Reduction Plan or the San Pedro Bay Ports Clean Air Action Plan, and provide updated information for the projects on those lists, where feasible. In the assessment, the port, at a minimum, shall identify the projects, funding source or possible funding source, and estimated timelines for implementation.

(d) On or before July 1, 2012, the port shall provide this assessment to the
 Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, Assembly Committee on Transportation, Senate Committee on Environmental Quality, and Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing. The report shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment of total costs, including updating cost estimates from previous reports or project lists, for the infrastructure and air quality improvements, as well as identifying funding for projects that may have a source of funding and identifying possible funding options for projects without a funding source.

(1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (SB 739)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2012, the Port of Los Angeles shall assess its infrastructure and air quality improvement needs.

(b) The port, when assessing infrastructure projects, shall consult with the Southern California Association of Governments on projects that improve the efficiency of cargo movement and reduce congestion impacts associated with the movement of cargo to and from the port through the southern California region. The port shall identify any project lists and provide any updated information for the projects on those lists. In the assessment, the port, at a minimum, shall identify the projects, funding source or possible funding source, and estimated timelines for completion.

(c) The port, when assessing air quality projects, shall consult with the South Coast Air Quality Management District on projects that reduce pollution associated with the movement of cargo to and from the port through the southern California region, including, but not limited to, projects that reduce pollution from trucks, cargo handling equipment, locomotives, and ships that move cargo within and to and from the port. The port shall identify any project lists, such as the Goods Movement Emission Reduction Plan or the San Pedro Bay Ports Clean Air Action Plan, and provide updated information for the projects on those lists, where feasible. In the assessment, the port, at a minimum, shall identify the projects, funding source or possible funding source, and estimated timelines for implementation.

(d) On or before July 1, 2012, the port shall provide this assessment to the
 Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, Assembly Committee on Transportation, Senate Committee on Environmental Quality, and Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing and shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment of total costs, including updating cost estimates from previous reports or project lists, for the infrastructure and air quality improvements, as well as identifying funding for projects that may have a source of funding and identifying possible funding options for projects without a funding source.

(1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (SB 739)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1770.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2012, the Port of Oakland shall assess its infrastructure and air quality improvement needs.

(b) The port, when assessing infrastructure projects, shall consult with the Metropolitan Transportation Commission on projects that improve the efficiency of cargo movement and reduce congestion impacts associated with the movement of cargo to and from the port through the northern California region. The port shall identify any project lists and provide any updated information for the projects on those lists. In the assessment, the port, at a minimum, shall identify the projects, funding source or possible funding source, and estimated timelines for completion.

(c) The port, when assessing air quality projects, shall consult with the Bay Area Air Quality Management District on projects that reduce pollution associated with the movement of cargo to and from the port through the northern California region, including, but not limited to, projects that reduce pollution from trucks, cargo handling equipment, locomotives, and ships that move cargo within and to and from the port. The port shall identify any project lists, such as the Goods Movement Emission Reduction Plan, and provide updated information for the projects on those lists, where feasible. In the assessment, the port, at a minimum, shall identify the projects, funding source or possible funding source, and estimated timelines for implementation.

(d) On or before July 1, 2012, the port shall provide this assessment to the
 Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, Assembly Committee on Transportation, Senate Committee on Environmental Quality, and Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing. The report shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment of total costs, including updating cost estimates from previous reports or project lists, for the infrastructure and air quality improvements, as well as identifying funding for projects that may have a source of funding and identifying possible funding options for projects without a funding source.

(1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (SB 739)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. HARBOR DEVELOPMENT BOND LAW OF 1958 [3900. - 3953.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [3900. - 3928.]

3900.

This part may be cited as the Harbor Development Bond Law of 1958.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3901.

As used in this chapter the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Harbor Improvement Bond Committee.

(b) “Authority” means the San Francisco Port Authority, as the same is constituted by Part 1 (commencing at Section 1690) of Division 6 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or any successor thereof.

(c) “Commission” means the Harbors and Watercraft Commission, as the same is constituted by Division 1 (commencing with Section 30) of this code, or any successor thereof.

(d) “San Francisco Harbor Improvement Fund” means the fund now existing in the State Treasury and created by Section 1706.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

3902.

The following funds are created in the State Treasury for the purposes of this part:

(a) Harbor Bond Sinking Fund.

(b) Fifth San Francisco Seawall Fund.

(c) Small Craft Harbor Bond Fund.

(d) Small Craft Harbor Improvement Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3903.

There is in the State Government the Harbor Improvement Bond Committee. The committee shall consist of the State Controller, the State Treasurer, and the Director of Finance. The Director of Finance shall be the chairman of the committee. A majority of the members of the committee shall be empowered to act for the committee. The committee shall hold meetings at such times and places as the chairman shall direct or upon the written request of any two members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3904.

The members of the committee shall not receive additional compensation for their services under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3905.

For the purpose of creating funds to provide for the construction, improvement and development of harbors in this State as provided in this part, the Harbor Improvement Bond Committee is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the manner and to the extent hereinafter provided, but not otherwise, nor in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3906.

After adoption of any resolution by the committee, provided for in Section 3907, the State Treasurer shall arrange for the preparation of the requisite number of suitable bonds in accordance with the specifications contained in such resolution. The aggregate par value of all bonds issued under this part shall not exceed the sum of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000).

The authorization to issue bonds as herein set forth shall be a continuing authorization until all of said bonds shall have been issued and sold, but no bonds shall be issued or sold pursuant to this part subsequent to July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3907.

Whenever the authority pursuant to Section 3940 or the commission pursuant to Section 3950 determines by resolution that a bond issue under this part is necessary or desirable in order to make any of the expenditures authorized by this part, and so certifies to the committee, then the said committee shall approve or disapprove said resolution, and if it approves said resolution, the committee shall adopt a resolution authorizing and directing the State Treasurer to arrange for the preparation of the requisite number of suitable bonds and shall specify as to such bonds then to be sold:

(a) The aggregate number, aggregate par value, demoninations and the date of the bonds to be then sold. The bonds may be issued in series or divisions of the total authorized issue. Such demoninations shall be in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or multiples thereof. The date appearing on the bonds or series or division shall be deemed to be the date of issuance of such series or division for all purposes of this part, irrespective of the actual date of delivery of such bonds of such series or division and the payment of the purchase price thereof.

(b) The dates of maturity, and the amount and numercial sequence of the bonds maturing at each date of maturity, which amounts need not be equal, but which dates shall be at annual or semiannual intervals, and the first of which dates of maturity shall be not more than five years, and the last of which dates of maturity shall be not more than 50 years, after the date of the bonds or any series or division thereof.

(c) Whether or not the bonds are to be subject to redemption at the option of the authority or the commission, as the case may be, prior to maturity, and, if so, the provisions for such redemption, the manner of the call thereof, and the price or prices at which the bonds shall be subject to redemption.

(d) The annual rate, or rates, of interest which the bonds to be issued shall bear, which rate, or rates, at the discretion of the committee, may be determined by the bidder at the time of sale of said bonds, not to exceed 6 percent per annum. Such interest may be payable at such periods as may be fixed by the committee.

(e) The technical form and language of the bonds and interest coupons.

(f) Whether or not the right is reserved to make delivery in the form of temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, exchangeable for definitive bonds when executed and available for delivery, and if such right is reserved the denominations and form of such temporary securities.

(g) Whether or not the bonds are to be subject to registration, the demoninations of registered bonds and the provisions, if any, for the interexchange of bonds of different denominations, the issuance of new bonds of different denominations in lieu of, or in exchange for, bonds of a like aggregate principal amount but of different denominations and the form and all of the terms and conditions of such registration and of such exchange. If such registration is provided for, all of the provisions of this part with reference to the payment of bonds and interest coupons shall be subject to the terms and conditions of such registration with respect to the payment of registered bonds and the interest thereon.

(h) All other terms and conditions of the bonds and of the execution, issuance and sale thereof, which shall be consistent with all of the provisions of this part.

(i) The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3908.

The aggregate par value of all bonds issued under this part at the instance of the authority shall not exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) and the aggregate par value of all bonds issued under this part at the instance of the commission shall not exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3909.

All bonds issued under this part shall bear the facsimile signature of the Governor and the facsimile countersignature of the Controller and shall be endorsed by the State Treasurer by facsimile signature and the bonds shall be signed, countersigned and endorsed by the officers who shall be in office on the date of the adoption of the resolution of the committee, and each of the bonds shall bear a facsimile of the Great Seal of the State of California. Interest coupons attached to each bond shall bear the facsimile signature of the State Treasurer who shall be in office on the date of the adoption of the resolution of the committee. The bonds and coupons so signed, countersigned, endorsed and sealed, when sold and delivered, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation upon the State of California, although the sale or delivery thereof be made at a date or dates upon which the officers having signed, countersigned and endorsed the bonds, or any or either of such officers, shall have ceased to be the incumbents of the offices held by them at the time of signing, countersigning, or endorsing such bonds. Each bond issued under this part shall contain a clause or clauses stating that interest shall cease to accrue thereon from and after the date of maturity thereof, and referring to the resolution of the committee, by virtue of which the bond is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3910.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof. There is hereby appropriated from any available moneys in the account established in the Harbor Bond Sinking Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3918.5, or if such moneys are insufficient, then from the General Fund of the State of California, such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds issued and sold at the instance of the authority pursuant to the provisions of this part, as such principal and interest become due and payable. There is hereby appropriated from any available moneys in the account established in the Harbor Bond Sinking Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3918.5, or if such moneys are insufficient then from the General Fund of the State of California, such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds issued and sold at the instance of the commission pursuant to the provisions of this part, as such principal and interest become due and payable. Any sums withdrawn from the General Fund for the payment of principal of or interest on the bonds shall be returned to the General Fund as soon as moneys are available for that purpose in the Harbor Bond Sinking Fund account for the benefit of which the appropriation had been made from the General Fund, together with interest thereon at the same rate as, at the time of appropriation, is earned by short term current investments through the pooled money investment account, such earnings to be determined by the Controller.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the State, as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on said bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of said revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3911.

In determining the dates of maturity of the bonds, and the amount thereof to mature at each date of maturity, the committee shall be guided, so far as it may deem to be practicable, by the amounts of the revenue estimated to accrue to the Harbor Bond Sinking Fund. The committee shall fix and determine the dates and amounts of such maturities in such manner that, together with the dates and amounts of interest payments on the bonds, they shall coincide, as nearly as it may deem to be practicable, with the dates and amounts of such estimated revenue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3912.

The rate of interest to be borne by the bonds need not be uniform for all bonds of the same issue, series or division and shall be the rate or rates fixed and determined by the committee in a resolution adopted prior to the sale of the bonds or as specified in the bid accepted by the State Treasurer if the bonds are sold on the basis of the bidder naming the interest rate or rates, in which event the State Treasurer shall fix such rate or rates in conformity with the bid of the successful bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3913.

Both principal of and interest on the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States, at the Office of the State Treasurer, or at the office of any duly authorized fiscal agent of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3914.

Each bond shall contain a reference to this part and if subject to call or redemption prior to maturity, a recital to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3915.

The bonds authorized to be issued under this part shall be sold by the State Treasurer to the highest bidder for cash, either at public auction or upon sealed bids as the committee may by resolution determine. Highest bidder shall be the bidder whose bid will result in the lowest net interest cost on account of said bonds. If the State Treasurer determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the State Treasurer may reject all bids received. The Treasurer may from time to time, by public announcement at the place and time fixed for the sale, continue such sale, as to the whole of the bonds offered, or any part thereof offered, at such time and place as he may select. If the bonds are offered for sale upon sealed bids, then each bid shall be in writing and signed by the bidder and sealed, and shall be accompanied by the deposit of a certified check or cashier’s check for one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the par value of the bonds so offered for sale, but not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), drawn on a bank or trust company authorized to transact and transacting business in the State of California, payable to the Treasurer of the State of California, such deposit not to bear interest. The deposit of each unsuccessful bidder shall be returned to him immediately upon the nonacceptance of his bid, and the deposit of the successful bidder shall immediately upon the acceptance of his bid become and be the property of the State of California and be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of the Fifth San Francisco Seawall Fund with respect to bonds issued at the instance of the authority and to the credit of the Small Craft Harbor Bond Fund with respect to bonds issued at the instance of the commission, and shall be credited to the successful purchaser upon the purchase price of the bonds bid for in case such purchase price is paid in full by him within the time mutually agreed upon between the successful bidder and the Treasurer. If the purchase price is not so paid, the successful bidder shall have no right in and to the bonds or by reason of such bid, or to the recovery of the deposit accompanying the bid, or to any allowance or credit by reason of such deposit unless it shall appear that the bonds would not be validly issued if delivered to the purchaser in the form and manner proposed. In case the purchase price is not so paid, the bonds so sold but not paid for shall be resold by the State Treasurer upon notice as provided in case of original sale.

Temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts of any denomination whatever and with or without coupons attached thereto, to be signed by the State Treasurer, may be issued and delivered until the definitive bonds are executed and available for delivery. Signature of the State Treasurer may be by facsimile or signature stamp.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3916.

Due notice of the time and place of sale of all bonds shall be given by the State Treasurer by publication in one newspaper published in the City and County of San Francisco and also by publication in one newspaper published in the City of Sacramento and by publication in one newspaper published in the City of Los Angeles once a week during two weeks prior to such sale. In addition to the notice last above provided for, the State Treasurer may give such further notice as he may deem advisable.

All money secured from the sale of bonds issued at the instance of the authority, other than such amount as may have been paid as premium or accrued interest thereon, and excluding any amount paid pursuant to Section 3916.5, shall be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of the Fifth San Francisco Seawall Fund. All money secured from the sale of bonds issued at the instance of the commission, other than such amount as may have been paid as premium or accrued interest thereon, and excluding any amount paid pursuant to Section 3916.5 shall be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of the Small Craft Harbor Bond Fund. Any premium or accrued interest received on the sale of bonds issued and sold at the instance of the authority shall be deposited in the account established in the Harbor Bond Sinking Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3918.5, and any premium or accrued interest received on the sale of bonds issued and sold at the instance of the commission shall be deposited in the account established in the Harbor Bond Sinking Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3918.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

3916.5.
